California, session 20252026 Special Session 1, AB6.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4581.5 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:4581.5. (a) Projects exclusively for noncommercial wildfire fuels reduction in timberland, paid for in part or in whole with public funds, may prepare a timber harvesting plan pursuant to this article as an alternative to complying with Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000).(b) Projects that prepare a timber harvesting plan in lieu of complying with Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered timber operations, but shall be regulated as timber operations.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.